Massachusetts, session 194th, H4730.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 244 the following section:-
Section 245. (a) As used in this section the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Estimated cost'', a projection of funds needed during a fiscal year for the purchase,
storage and distribution of opioid antagonists.
''Opioid antagonist'', naloxone or any other drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration as a competitive narcotic antagonist used in the reversal of overdoses caused by
opioids.
“Opioid antagonist distribution”, the provision of opioid antagonists to healthcare
facilities including, but not limited to:
(i) acute care hospitals;
of 7

(ii) emergency departments;
(iii) substance use disorder treatment facilities; and
(iv) community health centers
provided that, opioid antagonists shall be offered to a patient who has (i) a history of
using opioids; (ii) been diagnosed with opioid use disorder; or (iii) experienced an opioid-related
overdose.
“Substance use disorder treatment facilities”, a facility licensed or approved by the
department or the department of mental health to offer treatment for substance use disorder,
including, but not limited to: (i) withdrawal management services; (ii) clinical stabilization
services; (iii) transitional support services; (iv) residential support services; (v) community
behavioral health center services; (vi) office-based opioid or addiction treatment services; or (vii)
inpatient or outpatient substance use disorder services.
(b) There shall be established in the commonwealth a separate trust fund to be known as
the Naloxone Purchase Trust Fund to support a universal purchase system for opioid antagonist
distribution in the commonwealth. The fund shall be expended to cover the costs of opioid
antagonist distribution. The fund shall consist of all monies transferred from the executive office
of health and human services pursuant to section 66 of chapter 118E, all money received as
voluntary contributions to the fund, including but not limited to contributions from third party
payers or third party administrators, as defined in section 1 of chapter 12C and any interest
earnings on such monies. The fund shall be maintained by the commissioner of the department or
a designee. The monies shall be expended under the direction of the department, without prior
appropriation, solely to cover opioid antagonist distribution program costs; provided, however,
of 7

that the amount to be expended for storing and distributing opioid antagonists, if such costs are
not covered by federal contribution, shall not exceed 10 per cent of the total amount of the fund
expended for the purchase of naloxone needed for opioid agonist distribution in the
commonwealth. The department may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts in anticipation of the most recent estimate of expected receipts, as certified by
the secretary of administration and finance; provided, however, that no expenditure shall be
made from the fund that shall cause the fund to be in deficit at the close of a fiscal year. Any
balance in the fund at the close of a fiscal year shall be available for expenditure in subsequent
fiscal years and shall not be transferred to any other fund or revert to the General Fund. The
commissioner of the department or a designee shall annually report the amount of funds
collected and any expenditures made from the fund to the house and senate committees on ways
and means, the joint committee on public health and the joint committee on health care
financing.
(c) The department may adopt rules and regulations as necessary to implement the
universal purchase and distribution system under this chapter and other applicable state and
federal laws.
SECTION 2. Section 64 of chapter 118E, as most recently amended by section 122 of
chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Medicaid
managed care organization services subject to assessment” the following definition:-
“Opioid antagonist revenue amount”, the estimated costs to purchase, store and distribute
opioid antagonists for the reversal of overdoses caused by opioids and administer the Naloxone
Purchase Trust Fund, established in section 245 of chapter 111 and that take into consideration
of 7

the limitations on expenditures described in subsection (b) of section 245 of chapter 111 as well
as any anticipated surplus or deficit in said Naloxone Purchase Trust Fund, but excluding any
costs anticipated to be covered by federal contribution.
SECTION 3. Said section 64 of said chapter 118E, as most recently amended by section
122 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out the definition of
“Total managed care organization services assessment amount” and inserting in place thereof the
following definition:-
“Total managed care organization services assessment amount”, an amount equal, for
each year, to the sum of the following in the same year: (i) the managed care organization
reinvestment revenue amount; (ii) the health safety net managed care organization revenue
amount; (iii) the Massachusetts Child Psychiatry Access Project revenue amount; (iv) the
immunization revenue amount; (v) the health policy commission revenue amount; (vi) the center
for health information and analysis revenue amount; (vii) the amount transferred, pursuant to
section 66, to the Behavioral Health Access and Crisis Intervention Trust Fund established in
section 2WWWWW of chapter 29; (viii) the opioid antagonist revenue amount; and (ix) the
amounts necessary to incorporate prospectively all adjustments or reconciliations to account for
under-assessments in the prior year.
SECTION 4. Subsection (b) of section 66 of chapter 118E, as most recently amended by
section 126 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking the words “and
(vii) all property and securities acquired by and through the use of money belonging to the fund
and all interest thereon” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
of 7

“(vii) an amount equal to the opioid antagonist revenue amount established in section
2245 of chapter 111; and (viii) all property and securities acquired by and through the use of
money belonging to the fund and all interest thereon”
SECTION 5. Said subsection (b) of section 66 of chapter 118E, as most recently
amended by section 126 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking the
words “and (K) $35,000,000 to the Essential Community Provider Trust Fund established in
section 2PPP of chapter 29” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
“ (K) $35,000,000 to the Essential Community Provider Trust Fund established in section
2PPP of chapter 29; and (L) an amount equal to the opioid antagonist revenue amount
established in section 225 of chapter 111”
SECTION 6. Said subsection (b) of section 66 of chapter 118E, as most recently
amended by section 126 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking the
words, “and the Behavioral Health Access and Crisis Intervention Trust Fund” and inserting in
place thereof the following words:-
“, the Behavioral Health Access and Crisis Intervention Trust Fund and the Naloxone
Purchase Trust Fund,”
SECTION 7. Said subsection (b) of section 66 of chapter 118E, as most recently
amended by section 127 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking the
words “and (vii) all property and securities acquired by and through the use of money belonging
to the fund and all interest thereon” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
of 7

“(vii) an amount equal to the opioid antagonist revenue amount established in section 225
of chapter 111; and (vii) all property and securities acquired by and through the use of money
100 belonging to the fund and all interest thereon”
101 SECTION 8. Said subsection (b) of section 66 of chapter 118E, as most recently
102 amended by section 127 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking the
103 words “and (F) an amount equal to the center for health information and analysis revenue
104 amount to the Center for Health Information and Analysis Fund established in section 7A of
105 chapter 12C” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
106 “(F) an amount equal to the center for health information and analysis revenue amount to
107 the Center for Health Information and Analysis Fund established in section 7A of chapter 12C;
108 and (G) an amount equal to the opioid antagonist revenue amount established in section 225 of
109 chapter 111”
110 SECTION 9. Said subsection (b) of section 66 of chapter 118E, as most recently
111 amended by section 127 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking the
112 words “and the Behavioral Health Access and Crisis Intervention Trust Fund” and inserting in
113 place thereof the following words:-
114 “, the Behavioral Health Access and Crisis Intervention Trust Fund and the Naloxone
115 Purchase Trust Fund,”
116 SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary
117 of health and human services shall seek all required federal approvals that the secretary deems
118 necessary to implement sections 1 to 9, inclusive, including any required waivers under 42 CFR
119 § 433.68 necessary to implement changes to the managed care organization services assessment
of 7

120 described in section 68 of chapter 118E of the General Laws. Sections 1 to 9. inclusive, shall not
121 become effective until the later of the effective date of this act or the first full calendar month
122 following the calendar month in which the secretary determines that all such federal approvals
123 have been received.
of 7